Hawaii statutes.
§302A-804 Powers and duties of the
department, commission, and charter schools. (a) The department,
commission, and charter schools shall retain all of their rights and powers
except for the authority provided to the board under this subpart.

(b) The department's powers and duties under
this subpart shall be limited to:

(1) Hiring, except in emergency situations as
described in this chapter, licensed teachers to teach in their fields of
licensing;

(2) Reporting data annually to the board about the supply
of, and demand for, teachers in department schools, including the
identification of shortage areas, out-of-field teaching assignments, numbers of
teachers teaching out-of-field, numbers and types of courses and classes taught
by out-of-field teachers, and numbers and types of students taught by
out-of-field teachers;

(3) On an emergency and case-by-case basis, hiring
unlicensed individuals; provided that:

(A) A list of the names, work sites, teaching
assignments, and progress toward licensing of these individuals shall be
reported to the board and any changes shall be updated on a monthly basis by
the department;

(B) There are no properly licensed teachers
for the specific assignments for which the individuals are being hired; and

(C) No individual may be employed by the
department on an emergency basis for more than three years. During this time,
the individual shall demonstrate active pursuit of licensing in each year of
employment;

(4) Submitting an annual report to the board
documenting:

(A) The number of emergency hires in
department schools by subject matter areas and by school;

(B) The reasons and duration of employment
for the emergency hiring enumerated in subparagraph (A);

(C) Individual progress toward licensing; and

(D) The department's efforts to address the
shortages described in subparagraph (A); and

(5) Providing any other information requested by the
board that is pertinent to its powers and duties.

(c) The commission's powers and duties under
this subpart shall be limited to:

(1) Reporting data annually to the board about the
supply of, and demand for, teachers in charter schools, including the
identification of shortage areas, out-of-field teaching assignments, numbers of
teachers teaching out-of-field, numbers and types of courses and classes taught
by out-of-field teachers, and numbers and types of students taught by
out-of-field teachers;

(2) Submitting an annual report to the board
documenting:

(A) The number of emergency hires in charter
schools by subject matter areas and by school;

(B) The reasons and duration of employment
for the emergency hiring enumerated in subparagraph (A); and

(C) Individual progress toward licensing; and

(3) Providing any other information requested by the
board that is pertinent to the commission's powers and duties.

(d) A charter school's powers and duties under
this subpart shall be limited to:

(1) Except in emergency situations as described in
this chapter, hiring licensed teachers to teach in their fields of licensing;

(2) On an emergency and case-by-case basis, hiring
unlicensed individuals; provided that:

(A) A list of the names, work sites, teaching
assignments, and progress toward licensing of these individuals shall be
reported to the board and any changes shall be updated on a monthly basis by
the charter schools;

(B) There are no properly licensed teachers
for the specific assignments for which the individuals are being hired; and

(C) No individual may be employed by the
charter school on an emergency basis for more than three years. During this
time, the individual shall demonstrate active pursuit of licensing in each year
of employment; and

(3) Providing any other information requested by the
board that is pertinent to the charter school's powers and duties. [L 1996, c
89, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 312, pt of §10; am L 2008, c 125, §§2, 4; am L 2011,
c 23, §1; am L 2014, c 39, §6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next